Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Part 4. Registration and Modification of Foreign Child-Support Order

§ 93-25-615.
Jurisdiction
to modify child-support order of foreign country.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 93-25-711, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child-support order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of this state may assume jurisdiction to modify the child-support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether the consenttomodification of a child-support order otherwise required of theindividualpursuant to Section 93-25-611 has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of this state or of the foreign country.

An order issued by a tribunal of this state modifying a foreign child-support order pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-616.
Procedure to
register child-support order of foreign country for
modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a foreign child-support order not under the Convention may register that order in this state under Sections 93-25-601 through 93-25-608 if the order has not been registered. A complaint for modification may be filedatthe same time as a request for registration, or at another time.Thecomplaint must specify the grounds for modification.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.